test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_njamma_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - spaha: # - ok
    spaha+N+Sg+Nom:  spaˊha
    spaha+N+Sg+Gen:  spaˊṿa
    spaha+N+Sg+Acc:  spaˊṿa
    spaha+N+Sg+Ill:  spaˊhan
    spaha+N+Sg+Loc:  spavvaast
    spaha+N+Sg+Com:  spavvain
    spaha+N+Sg+Abe:  spaˊṿattáá
    spaha+N+Ess:  spahhaan
    spaha+N+Par:  spahhaad
    spaha+N+Pl+Nom:  spaˊṿah
    spaha+N+Pl+Gen:  spaˊṿai
    spaha+N+Pl+Acc:  spaˊṿaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Ill:  spavvaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Loc:  spaˊṿain
    spaha+N+Pl+Com:  spaˊṿaiguin
    spaha+N+Pl+Abe:  spaˊṿaittáá

  Noun - rahka: # - ok
    rahka+N+Sg+Nom:  rahka
    rahka+N+Sg+Gen:  raˊhka
    rahka+N+Sg+Acc:  raˊhka
    rahka+N+Sg+Ill:  raahkan
    rahka+N+Sg+Loc:  rahkaast
    rahka+N+Sg+Com:  rahkain
    rahka+N+Sg+Abe:  raˊhkattáá
    rahka+N+Ess:  rahkan
    rahka+N+Par:  rahkad
    rahka+N+Pl+Nom:  raˊhkah
    rahka+N+Pl+Gen:  [raˊhkai, rahkai]
    rahka+N+Pl+Acc:  rahkaid
    rahka+N+Pl+Ill:  rahkaid
    rahka+N+Pl+Loc:  rahkain
    rahka+N+Pl+Com:  raˊhkaiguin
    rahka+N+Pl+Abe:  raˊhkaittáá

  Noun - njamma: # - ok
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom:  njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen:  njaˊṃa
    njamma+N+Sg+Acc:  njaˊṃa
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill:  njaaṃan
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc:  njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com:  njammain
    njamma+N+Sg+Abe:  njaˊṃattáá
    njamma+N+Ess:  njamman
    njamma+N+Par: njammad
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom:  njaˊṃah
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen:  njaˊṃai
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc:  [njaˊṃaid, njammaid]
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill:  njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc:  njaˊṃain
    njamma+N+Pl+Com:  njaˊṃaiguin
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe:  njaˊṃaittáá

  Noun - plasma: # - ok
    plasma+N+Sg+Nom:  plasma
    plasma+N+Sg+Gen:  plaˊsma
    plasma+N+Sg+Acc:  plaˊsma
    plasma+N+Sg+Ill:  plaasman
    plasma+N+Sg+Loc:  plasmaast
    plasma+N+Sg+Com:  plasmain
    plasma+N+Sg+Abe:  plaˊsmattáá
    plasma+N+Ess:  plasman
    plasma+N+Par:  plasmad
    plasma+N+Pl+Nom:  plaˊsmah
    plasma+N+Pl+Gen:  [plaˊsmai, plasmai]
    plasma+N+Pl+Acc:  plasmaid
    plasma+N+Pl+Ill:  plasmaid
    plasma+N+Pl+Loc:  plasmain
    plasma+N+Pl+Com:  plaˊsmaiguin
    plasma+N+Pl+Abe:  plaˊsmaittáá

  Noun - lahna: # - ok
    lahna+N+Sg+Nom:  lahna
    lahna+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊhna
    lahna+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊhna
    lahna+N+Sg+Ill:  laahnan
    lahna+N+Sg+Loc:  lahnaast
    lahna+N+Sg+Com:  lahnain
    lahna+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊhnattáá
    lahna+N+Ess:  lahnan
    lahna+N+Par:  lahnad
    lahna+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊhnah
    lahna+N+Pl+Gen:  [laˊhnai,lahnai]
    lahna+N+Pl+Acc:  lahnaid
    lahna+N+Pl+Ill:  lahnaid
    lahna+N+Pl+Loc:  lahnain
    lahna+N+Pl+Com:  laˊhnaiguin
    lahna+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊhnaittáá

  Noun - avra: # - ok
    avra+N+Sg+Nom:  avra
    avra+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊvra
    avra+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊvra
    avra+N+Sg+Ill:  aavran
    avra+N+Sg+Loc:  avraast
    avra+N+Sg+Com:  avrain
    avra+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊvrattáá
    avra+N+Ess:  avran
    avra+N+Par:  avrad
    avra+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊvrah
    avra+N+Pl+Gen:  [aˊvrai, avrai]
    avra+N+Pl+Acc:  avraid
    avra+N+Pl+Ill:  avraid
    avra+N+Pl+Loc:  avrain
    avra+N+Pl+Com:  aˊvraiguin
    avra+N+Pl+Abe:  aˊvraittáá

  Noun - kavra: # - ok
    kavra+N+Sg+Nom:  kavra
    kavra+N+Sg+Gen:  kaˊvra
    kavra+N+Sg+Acc:  kaˊvra
    kavra+N+Sg+Ill:  kaavran
    kavra+N+Sg+Loc:  kavraast
    kavra+N+Sg+Com:  kavrain
    kavra+N+Sg+Abe:  kaˊvrattáá
    kavra+N+Ess:  kavran
    kavra+N+Par:  kavrad
    kavra+N+Pl+Nom:  kaˊvrah
    kavra+N+Pl+Gen:  [kaˊvrai, kavrai]
    kavra+N+Pl+Acc:  kavraid
    kavra+N+Pl+Ill:  kavraid
    kavra+N+Pl+Loc:  kavrain
    kavra+N+Pl+Com:  kaˊvraiguin
    kavra+N+Pl+Abe:  kaˊvraittáá

  Noun - seŋkka: # - ok
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Nom:  seŋkka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Gen:  seˊŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Acc:  seˊŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Ill:  seeŋkan
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Loc:  seŋkkaast
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Com:  seŋkkain
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Abe:  seˊŋkattáá
    seŋkka+N+Ess:  seŋkkan
    seŋkka+N+Par:  seŋkkad
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Nom:  seˊŋkah
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Gen: [seeŋkai, seˊŋkai]
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Acc:  seeŋkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Ill:  seŋkkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Loc:  seˊŋkain
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Com:  seˊŋkaiguin
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Abe:  seˊŋkaittáá

  Noun - teltta: # - ok
    teltta+N+Sg+Nom:  teltta
    teltta+N+Sg+Gen:  teˊlta
    teltta+N+Sg+Acc:  teˊlta
    teltta+N+Sg+Ill:  teeltan
    teltta+N+Sg+Loc:  telttaast
    teltta+N+Sg+Com:  telttain
    teltta+N+Sg+Abe:  teˊltattáá
    teltta+N+Ess:  telttan
    teltta+N+Par:  telttad
    teltta+N+Pl+Nom:  teˊltah
    teltta+N+Pl+Gen:  [teeltai, teˊltai]
    teltta+N+Pl+Acc:  teeltaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Ill:  telttaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Loc:  teˊltain
    teltta+N+Pl+Com:  teˊltaiguin
    teltta+N+Pl+Abe:  teˊltaittáá

  Noun - maila: # - ok
    maila+N+Sg+Nom:  maila
    maila+N+Sg+Gen:  maˊila
    maila+N+Sg+Acc:  maˊila
    maila+N+Sg+Ill:  maailan
    maila+N+Sg+Loc:  mailaast
    maila+N+Sg+Com:  mailain
    maila+N+Sg+Abe:  maˊilattáá
    maila+N+Ess:  mailan
    maila+N+Par:  mailad
    maila+N+Pl+Nom:  maˊilah
    maila+N+Pl+Gen:  [maˊilai, mailai]
    maila+N+Pl+Acc:  mailaid
    maila+N+Pl+Ill:  mailaid
    maila+N+Pl+Loc:  mailain
    maila+N+Pl+Com:  maˊilaiguin
    maila+N+Pl+Abe:  maˊilaittáá

  Noun - ohra: # - ok
    ohra+N+Sg+Nom:  ohra
    ohra+N+Sg+Gen:  oˊhra
    ohra+N+Sg+Acc:  oˊhra
    ohra+N+Sg+Ill:  oohran
    ohra+N+Sg+Loc:  ohraast
    ohra+N+Sg+Com:  ohrain
    ohra+N+Sg+Abe:  oˊhrattáá
    ohra+N+Ess:  ohran
    ohra+N+Par:  ohrad
    ohra+N+Pl+Nom:  oˊhrah
    ohra+N+Pl+Gen:  [oˊhrai, ohrai]
    ohra+N+Pl+Acc:  ohraid
    ohra+N+Pl+Ill:  ohraid
    ohra+N+Pl+Loc:  ohrain
    ohra+N+Pl+Com:  oˊhraiguin
    ohra+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊhraittáá

  Noun - luokka: # - ok
    luokka+N+Sg+Nom:  luokka
    luokka+N+Sg+Gen:  luoka
    luokka+N+Sg+Acc:  luoka
    luokka+N+Sg+Ill:  luokan
    luokka+N+Sg+Loc:  luokkaast
    luokka+N+Sg+Com:  luokkain
    luokka+N+Sg+Abe:  luokattáá
    luokka+N+Ess:  luokkan
    luokka+N+Par:  luokkad
    luokka+N+Pl+Nom:  luokah
    luokka+N+Pl+Gen:  luokai
    luokka+N+Pl+Acc:  luokaid
    luokka+N+Pl+Ill:  luokkaid
    luokka+N+Pl+Loc:  luokain
    luokka+N+Pl+Com:  luokaiguin
    luokka+N+Pl+Abe:  luokaittáá

  Noun - tutka: # - ok
    tutka+N+Sg+Nom:  tutka
    tutka+N+Sg+Gen:  tuˊtka
    tutka+N+Sg+Acc:  tuˊtka
    tutka+N+Sg+Ill:  tuutkan
    tutka+N+Sg+Loc:  tutkaast
    tutka+N+Sg+Com:  tutkain
    tutka+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊtkattáá
    tutka+N+Ess:  tutkan
    tutka+N+Par:  tutkad
    tutka+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊtkah
    tutka+N+Pl+Gen:  [tutkai, tuˊtkai]
    tutka+N+Pl+Acc:  tutkaid
    tutka+N+Pl+Ill:  tutkaid
    tutka+N+Pl+Loc:  tutkain
    tutka+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊtkaiguin
    tutka+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊtkaittáá

  Noun - tulppa: # - ok
    tulppa+N+Sg+Nom:  tulppa
    tulppa+N+Sg+Gen:  tuˊlpa
    tulppa+N+Sg+Acc:  tuˊlpa
    tulppa+N+Sg+Ill:  tuulpan
    tulppa+N+Sg+Loc:  tulppaast
    tulppa+N+Sg+Com:  tulppain
    tulppa+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊlpattáá
    tulppa+N+Ess:  tulppan
    tulppa+N+Par:  tulppad
    tulppa+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊlpah
    tulppa+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuˊlpai, tuulpai]
    tulppa+N+Pl+Acc: tuulpaid
    tulppa+N+Pl+Ill:  tulppaid
    tulppa+N+Pl+Loc:  tuˊlpain
    tulppa+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊlpaiguin
    tulppa+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊlpaittáá

  Noun - tundra: # - ok
    tundra+N+Sg+Nom:  tundra
    tundra+N+Sg+Gen:  tuˊndra
    tundra+N+Sg+Acc:  tuˊndra
    tundra+N+Sg+Ill:  tuundran
    tundra+N+Sg+Loc:  tundraast
    tundra+N+Sg+Com:  tundrain
    tundra+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊndrattáá
    tundra+N+Ess:  tundran
    tundra+N+Par:  tundrad
    tundra+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊndrah
    tundra+N+Pl+Gen:  [tundrai, tuˊndrai]
    tundra+N+Pl+Acc:  tundraid
    tundra+N+Pl+Ill:  tundraid
    tundra+N+Pl+Loc:  tundrain
    tundra+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊndraiguin
    tundra+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊndraittáá
